Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5803.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 23-27.3-100.0, 23-27.3-100.1 and 23-27.3-108.2 of the General
Laws in Chapter 23-27.3 entitled "State Building Code" are hereby amended to read as follows:
23-27.3-100.0. Scope.
This chapter governs the state building code and the establishment, operation and
maintenance of electronic permitting platforms for state and local permitting.
23-27.3-100.1. Short title — Applicability.
This act shall be known as the “Rhode Island state building code” referred to throughout
this chapter as “this code”, which includes a rehabilitation building and fire code for existing
buildings and structures. In accordance with this chapter, this act controls:
(1) The construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair, demolition, removal, inspection,
issuance, and revocation of permits or licenses, installation of equipment, classification, and
definition of any building or structure, and use or occupancy of all buildings and structure and parts
of them;
(2) The rehabilitation and maintenance of existing buildings;
(3) The standards or requirements for materials to be used in connection with buildings and
structures, including but not limited for safety, ingress and egress, energy conservation, and sanitary
conditions;
(4) The establishment of reasonable fees for the issuance of licenses and permits in
connection with buildings and structures;

(5) The establishment and maintenance of an electronic permitting platforms and
regulations related to the use of the platforms for all matters related to the applications and review
for state and local building permits, municipal zoning applications, municipal planning
applications, applications and permits for the department of environmental management,
applications and permits for the department of transportation and applications and permits for the
coastal resources management council.
Except as those matters are otherwise provided for in the general laws or in the rules and
regulations authorized for promulgation under the provisions of this code.
23-27.3-108.2. Duties of the state building code commissioner. [Effective January 1,
2025.]
(a) The state building code commissioner shall have the authority to enforce and perform
the duties required by the state building code, chapter 27.3 of this title, and all codes referenced
therein and adopted thereunder, and all other provisions of the general laws and public laws insofar
as such powers and duties relate to building codes and building inspection; provided, however, that
for the purposes of this section structures constituting tents and/or membrane frame structures as
defined in this state building code and any regulations promulgated hereunder shall be subject to
an annual certification process to be established by the state building commissioner in conjunction
with the state fire marshal and shall not be subject to recurring permit and fee requirements as
otherwise required by this code.
(b) The state building code commissioner shall work to standardize building code
interpretations across the state with input from the Rhode Island League of Cities and Towns and
ensure consistent enforcement of the code throughout the state.
(c) Permit fees. Permit fees for the projects construction under this chapter shall be
established by the committee. The fees shall be deposited as general revenues.
(d)(1) Building permit fees. The state building official or the local cities and towns, as
applicable, shall charge each permit applicant an additional one-tenth percent (0.1%) levy of the
total construction cost for each commercial permit issued, and two-tenths percent (0.2%) levy of
the total construction cost for each residential permit issued. The levy shall be limited to a
maximum of one hundred dollars ($100) for each of the permits issued for one- and two-family (2)
dwellings. This additional levy shall be transmitted monthly to the state building office at the
department of business regulation; and
(i) Fifty percent (50%) of this additional levy on residential permits and one hundred
percent (100%) of this additional levy on commercial permits shall be used to staff and support the
purchase or lease and operation of a web-accessible service and/or system to be utilized by the state
LC002163/SUB A - Page 2 of 11

and municipalities for uniform, statewide electronic plan review, permit management, and
inspection system and other programs described in this chapter. This portion of the fee levy shall
be deposited as general revenues.
(ii) Fifty percent (50%) of this additional levy on residential permits shall be transferred to
the department of labor and training and shall be deposited into the contractor training restricted
receipt account, which shall be exempt from the indirect cost recovery provisions of § 35-4-27.
Subject to appropriation by the general assembly, these funds shall be used to provide contractor
training grants for programs that shall include, but are not limited to, minority business enterprises
and state local building officials.
(2) Fees for electronic permitting from other state agencies and cities and towns. The local
cities and towns and any state agency utilizing an electronic permitting platform, except as set forth
in this section, shall charge each applicant in accordance with §§ 42-13-10, 42-17.1-46, 45-23-36.1,
45-24-58.1, 45-53-16 and 46-23-47 as applicable.
(d) Electronic permitting.
(1) For purposes of this section, "electronic permitting" means the use of computer-based
tools and services through a platform which automates and streamlines the application and permit
process to include, but not be limited to, task-specific tools for applications, submission of plans,
checklists, reports and other documents, reviews, permitting, scheduling, review and project
tracking, comments from staff and committees, fee calculation and collection; and workflow and
report management
(2) On or before July 1, 2013, the building commissioner shall develop a standard statewide
process for electronic plan review, permit management, and inspection. The process shall include,
but not be limited to: applications; submission of building plans and plans for developments and
plots; plan review; permitting; inspections; inspection scheduling; project tracking; fee calculation
and collections; and workflow and report management.
(3) On or before December 1, 2013, the building commissioner shall implement the
standard statewide process for electronic plan review, permit management, and inspection. In
addition, the building commissioner shall develop a technology and implementation plan for a
standard web-accessible service or system to be utilized by the state and municipalities for uniform,
statewide electronic plan review, permit management, and inspection for building permits. The plan
shall include, but not be limited to: applications; submission of building plans and plans for
developments and plots; plan review; permitting; inspections; inspection scheduling; project
tracking; fee calculation and collections; and workflow and report management.
(4) The building commissioner shall implement the standard statewide process for
LC002163/SUB A - Page 3 of 11

electronic permitting to be utilized pursuant to this section and §§ 23-27.3-115.6, 42-13-10, 42-
17.1-46, 45-23-36.1, 45-24-58.1, 45-53-16 and 46-23-27. In addition, the building commissioner
shall develop a technology and implementation plan for a web-accessible service or system to be
utilized by the state and municipalities for these purposes and shall cause the purchase or lease and
operation of a web-accessible service and/or system to be utilized by the state and municipalities
for electronic permitting (“electronic permitting platform”).
(2) On or before July 1, 2013, the building commissioner shall develop a standard statewide
process for electronic plan review, permit management, and inspection. The process shall include,
but not be limited to: applications; submission of building plans and plans for developments and
plots; plan review; permitting; inspections; inspection scheduling; project tracking; fee calculation
and collections; and workflow and report management.
(3) On or before December 1, 2013, the building commissioner, with the assistance of the
office of regulatory reform, shall implement the standard statewide process for electronic plan
review, permit management, and inspection. In addition, the building commissioner shall develop
a technology and implementation plan for a standard web-accessible service or system to be utilized
by the state and municipalities for uniform, statewide electronic plan review, permit management,
and inspection. The plan shall include, but not be limited to: applications; submission of building
plans and plans for developments and plots; plan review; permitting; inspections; inspection
scheduling; project tracking; fee calculation and collections; and workflow and report management.
(e)The building commissioner shall, upon request by any state contractor described in §
37-2-38.1, review, and when all conditions for certification have been met, certify to the state
controller that the payment conditions contained in § 37-2-38.1 have been met.
(f)The building commissioner shall coordinate the development and implementation of this
section with the state fire marshal to assist with the implementation of § 23-28.2-6. On or before
January 1, 2022, the building commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement
the provisions of this section and §§ 23-27.3-115.6, 42-13-10, 42-17.1-46, 45-23-36.1, 45-24-58.1,
45-53-16, and 46-23-27.
(g) The building commissioner shall submit, in coordination with the state fire marshal, a
report to the governor and general assembly on or before April 1, 2013, and each April 1 thereafter,
providing the status of the web-accessible service service(s) and/or system system(s)
implementation and any recommendations for process or system improvement. In every report
submitted on or after April, 2024, the building commissioner shall provide the following
information:
(1) The identity of every municipality and state agencies, as applicable in full compliance
LC002163/SUB A - Page 4 of 11

with the provisions §§ 23-27.3-115.6, 42-13-10, 42-17.1-46, 45-23-36.1, 45-24-58.1, 45-53-16 and
46-23-27 and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to the provisions of this section;
(2) The identity of every municipality or state agencies, as applicable, failing to fully
implement and comply with the provisions of §§ 23-27.3-115.6, 42-13-10, 42-17.1-46, 45-23-36.1,
45-24-58.1, 45-53-16 and 46-23-27 and/or the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to the
provisions of this section, and the nature, extent, and basis or reason for the failure or
noncompliance; and
(3) Recommendations to achieve compliance by all municipalities or state agencies as
applicable with the provisions of §§ 23-27.3-115.6, 42-13-10, 42-17.1-46, 45-23-36.1, 45-24-58.1,
45-53-16 and 46-23-27 and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this section.
(h)The building commissioner shall assist with facilitating the goals and objectives set forth
in § 28-42-84(a)(9).
(i) The state building code commissioner shall serve as the executive secretary to the state
building code standards committee.
(j) In addition to the state building code commissioner’s other duties as set forth in this
chapter, and notwithstanding the same, the state building code commissioner and the
commissioner’s staff shall assume the authority for the purposes of enforcing the provisions of the
state building code in a municipality where there is no local building official or alternate as detailed
in § 23-27.3-107.2, or where there are no local building inspectors.
SECTION 2. Section 45-23-36.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-23 entitled
"Subdivision of Land" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-23-36.1. Electronic permitting.
(a) On or before October 1, 2025, every municipality in the state shall adopt and implement
one electronic permitting platform established pursuant to § 23-27.3-108.2 to utilize for all
development applications filed under this chapter. For purposes of this section, “electronic
permitting” means use of computer-based tools and services that automate and streamline the
application process to include, but not be limited to, task-specific tools for: applications; submission
of plans; completed checklists and checklist documents; reports; plan review; permitting;
scheduling; certificates of completeness and incompleteness; supplemental submissions; project
tracking; staff and technical review committee comments; fee calculation and collection.
(b) The state building commissioner, with the assistance of the office of regulatory reform
and the division of statewide planning, pursuant to the provisions of § 23-27.3-108.2 may
promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this section.
(c) The local towns and cities shall charge each applicant an additional one-tenth of one
LC002163/SUB A - Page 5 of 11

percent (.001%) (.1%) of the total application fee for each application submitted. This additional
amount shall be transmitted monthly to the state building office at the department of business
regulation, and shall be used to staff and support the purchase or lease and operation of one web-
accessible service and/or system to be utilized by the state and municipalities for the uniform,
statewide electronic submission, review and processing of development applications as set forth in
this section.
(d) On or before October 1, 2025, notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to
the contrary, all acts, requirements, filings, and documents necessary to comply with the application
process shall be conducted by means of electronic permitting.
(e) The department of business regulation shall reimburse annual fees and costs associated
with compliance with this program in accordance with procedures established by the department.
SECTION 3. Section 45-24-58.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-24 entitled "Zoning
Ordinances" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-24-58.1. Electronic permitting.
(a) On or before October 1, 2025, every municipality in the state shall adopt and implement
one electronic permitting platform established pursuant to § 23-27.3-108.2 to utilize for all
development applications under this chapter. For purposes of this section, “electronic permitting”
means use of computer-based tools and services that automate and streamline the application
process to include, but not be limited to, task-specific tools for: applications; submission of plans;
completed checklists and checklist documents; reports; plan review; permitting; scheduling; project
tracking; staff and technical review committee comments; fee calculation and collection.
(b) The state building commissioner, with the assistance of the office of regulatory reform
and the division of statewide planning, pursuant to the provisions of § 23-27.3-108.2 may
promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this section.
(c) The local towns and cities shall charge each applicant an additional one-tenth of one
percent (.001%) (.1%) of the total application fee for each application submitted. This additional
amount shall be transmitted monthly to the state building office at the department of business
regulation, and shall be used to staff and support the purchase or lease and operation of one web-
accessible service and/or system to be utilized by the state and municipalities for the uniform,
statewide electronic submission, review and processing of development applications as set forth in
this section.
(d) On or before October 1, 2025, notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to
the contrary, all acts, requirements, filings, and documents necessary to comply with the application
process shall be conducted by means of electronic permitting.
LC002163/SUB A - Page 6 of 11

(e) The department of business regulation shall reimburse annual fees and costs associated
with compliance with this program in accordance with procedures established by the department.
SECTION 4. Section 45-53-16 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-53 entitled "Low and
Moderate Income Housing" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-53-16. Electronic permitting.
(a) On or before October 1, 2025, every municipality in the state shall adopt and implement
one electronic permitting platform established pursuant to § 23-27.3-108.2 to utilize for all
development applications under this chapter. For purposes of this section, “electronic permitting”
means use of computer-based tools and services that automate and streamline the application
process to include, but not be limited to, task-specific tools for: applications; submission of plans;
completed checklists and checklist documents; reports; plan review; permitting; scheduling; project
tracking; staff and technical review committee comments; fee calculation and collection.
(b) The state building commissioner, with the assistance of the office of regulatory reform
and the division of statewide planning, pursuant to the provisions of § 23-27.3-108.2 may
promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this section.
(c) The local towns and cities shall charge each applicant an additional one-tenth of one
percent (.001%) (.1%) of the total application fee for each application submitted. This additional
amount shall be transmitted monthly to the state building office at the department of business
regulation, and shall be used to staff and support the purchase or lease and operation of one web-
accessible service and/or system to be utilized by the state and municipalities for the uniform,
statewide electronic submission, review and processing of development applications as set forth in
this section.
(d) On or before October 1, 2025, notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to
the contrary, all acts, requirements, filings, and documents necessary to comply with the application
process shall be conducted by means of electronic permitting.
(e) The department of business regulation shall reimburse annual fees and costs associated
with compliance with this program in accordance with procedures established by the department.
SECTION 5. Section 23-27.3-100.1.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-27.3 entitled
"State Building Code" is hereby repealed.
23-27.3-100.1.1. Chapter title — Applicability.
This chapter shall be known as the Rhode Island State Building Code hereinafter referred
to as this code. This chapter shall control:
(1) The construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair, demolition, removal, inspection,
issuance, and revocation of permits or licenses, installation of equipment, classification and
LC002163/SUB A - Page 7 of 11

definition of any building or structure, and use or occupancy of all buildings and structure and parts
thereof;
(2) The rehabilitation and maintenance of existing buildings;
(3) The standards or requirements for materials to be used in connection therewith,
including, but not limited, for safety, ingress and egress, energy conservation, and sanitary
conditions;
(4) The establishment of reasonable fees for the issuance of licenses and permits in
connection therewith;
except as such matters are otherwise provided for in the general laws, or in the rules and
regulations authorized for promulgation under the provisions of this code.
SECTION 6. Chapter 42-13 of the General Laws entitled "Department of Transportation"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-13-10. Electronic Permitting.
(a) On or before October 1, 2026, the department of transportation shall adopt and
implement an electronic permitting platform pursuant to § 23-27.3-108.2 to utilize for all
applications filed under this chapter. For purposes of this section, “electronic permitting” means
use of computer-based tools and services that automate and streamline the application process to
include, but not be limited to, task-specific tools for: applications; submission of plans; documents;
reports; plan review; permitting; scheduling; supplemental submissions; project tracking; staff and
committee comments; fee calculation and collection.
(b) The state building commissioner, with the assistance of the office of regulatory reform
and the division of statewide planning, pursuant to the provisions of § 23-27.3-108.2 may
promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this section.
(c) The department of transportation shall charge each applicant an additional one-tenth
percent (.1%) of the total application fee for each application submitted. This additional amount
shall be transmitted monthly to the state building office and shall be used to staff and support the
purchase or lease and operation of one web-accessible service and/or system to be utilized for the
uniform, statewide electronic submission, review and processing of applications for permits and
approvals.
(d) On or before October 1, 2026, notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to
the contrary, all acts, requirements, filings, and documents necessary to comply with the application
process shall be conducted by means of electronic permitting.
SECTION 7. Chapter 42-17.1 of the General Laws entitled "Department of Environmental
Management" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
LC002163/SUB A - Page 8 of 11

42-17.1-46. Electronic Permitting.
(a) On or before October 1, 2026, the department of environmental management shall adopt
and implement an electronic permitting platform pursuant to § 23-27.3-108.2 to utilize for all
applications filed under this chapter. For purposes of this section, “electronic permitting” means
use of computer-based tools and services that automate and streamline the application process to
include, but not be limited to, task-specific tools for: applications; submission of plans; documents;
reports; plan review; permitting; scheduling; supplemental submissions; project tracking; staff and
committee comments; fee calculation and collection.
(b) The state building commissioner, with the assistance of the office of regulatory reform
and the division of statewide planning, pursuant to the provisions of § 23-27.3-108.2 may
promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this section.
(c) The department of environmental management shall charge each applicant an additional
one-tenth percent (.1%) of the total application fee for each application submitted. This additional
amount shall be transmitted monthly to the state building office and shall be used to staff and
support the purchase or lease and operation of one web-accessible service and/or system to be
utilized for the uniform, statewide electronic submission, review and processing of applications for
permits and approvals.
(d) On or before October 1, 2026, notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to
the contrary, all acts, requirements, filings, and documents necessary to comply with the application
process shall be conducted by means of electronic permitting.
SECTION 8. Chapter 46-23 of the General Laws entitled "Coastal Resources Management
Council" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
46-23-27. Electronic Permitting.
(a) On or before October 1, 2026, the coastal resources management council shall adopt
and implement an electronic permitting platform pursuant to § 23-27.3-108.2 to utilize for all
applications filed under this chapter. For purposes of this section, “electronic permitting” means
use of computer-based tools and services that automate and streamline the application process to
include, but not be limited to, task-specific tools for: applications; submission of plans; documents;
reports; plan review; permitting; scheduling; supplemental submissions; project tracking; staff and
committee comments; fee calculation and collection.
(b) The state building commissioner, with the assistance of the office of regulatory reform
and the division of statewide planning, pursuant to the provisions of § 23-27.3-108.2 may
promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this section.
(c) The coastal resources management council shall charge each applicant an additional
LC002163/SUB A - Page 9 of 11

one-tenth percent (.1%) of the total application fee for each application submitted. This additional
amount shall be transmitted monthly to the state building office and shall be used to staff and
support the purchase or lease and operation of a web-accessible service and/or system to be utilized
for the uniform, statewide electronic submission, review and processing of applications for permits
and approvals.
(d) On or before October 1, 2026, notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to
the contrary, all acts, requirements, filings, and documents necessary to comply with the application
process shall be conducted by means of electronic permitting.
(e) The department of business regulation shall reimburse annual fees and costs associated
with compliance with this program in accordance with procedures established by the department.
SECTION 9. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002163/SUB A
========
LC002163/SUB A - Page 10 of 11